Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 5. Educational Entry Permits.

Sec. 16.43.340.
Educational entry permits.

In addition to entry permits and interim-use permits, the commission may issue educational entry permits to public, private, or denominational educational institutions accredited by the Department of Education and Early Development or accredited institutions, career, or vocational programs approved by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education, or full-time nonprofit residential child care facilities licensed by the Department of Health and Social Services, division of social services, if

the program is offered to students at the junior high school level or above;

the issuance of an educational entry permit is reasonably necessary to the instruction of students under courses offered by the applicant for the educational entry permit;

the program is offered by an institution that is located in the state and has been in operation for at least two years; and

the institution offering the program is not a correspondence institution.

An educational entry permit may only be used in a program conducted by the recipient of the permit for the purpose of training students in the methods of commercial fishing.

The commission may issue educational entry permits notwithstanding the establishment of maximum or optimum numbers under AS

16.43.240

and

16.43.290

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 123 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

16.43.275

. Renumbered in 1983.

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

Secs. 16.43.341 — 16.43.343.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.430 — 16.43.440.]

Sec. 16.43.350.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.950.]

Sec. 16.43.351.
Term and conditions of educational entry permit.

Educational entry permits may be applied for on an annual basis and shall be issued for a term of one year. The permits are nontransferable.

A recipient may be issued an educational entry permit valid for designated fisheries in the administrative area the commission determines to be appropriate, considering the nature of the educational program and the location of the educational or vocational institution. The recipient of an educational entry permit may not be issued an educational entry permit in more than one administrative area except as issued by the commission in its discretion upon good cause shown.

An educational entry permit issued under AS

16.43.340

may be used by any agent or employee authorized by the recipient of the educational entry permit.

Annual fees for educational entry permits shall be as specified by commission regulation under the authority of AS

16.43.160

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 123 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 22 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.277. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

Secs. 16.43.355 — 16.43.360.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.960 — 16.43.970.]

Sec. 16.43.361.
Disposition of fish.

Fish caught under the authority of an educational entry permit are the property of the recipient of the permit.
The recipient may sell the fish and use the proceeds to pay for the costs of the training program. Revenues generated from the sale of fish harvested under an educational entry permit shall be paid to the general fund to the extent the revenues exceed costs of the training program.

History.

(§ 10 ch 123 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.279. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 16.43.370.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.980.]

Sec. 16.43.371.
Accounting of harvest.

The recipient of an educational entry permit shall report to the commission costs and earnings, amount of harvest, and other information the commission requires to monitor training programs of recipients of educational entry permits.

History.

(§ 10 ch 123 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.281. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 16.43.380.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.990.]

Sec. 16.43.381.
Adoption of regulations.

Use privileges granted under AS

16.43.340

—

16.43.390

are subject to the regulations of the Board of Fisheries, which may adopt regulations exclusively applicable to the use of educational entry permits.

The commission shall adopt regulations relating to the issuance of educational entry permits, establishing eligibility criteria for recipients of the permits, and such other matters as are reasonably necessary to implement AS

16.43.340

—

16.43.390

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 123 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.283. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

Sec. 16.43.390.
Definition of “recipient”.

In AS

16.43.340

—

16.43.390

, “recipient” means the entity to which an educational entry permit is issued.

History.

(§ 10 ch 123 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 16.43.285. Renumbered in 1983.